Nevada, session 83, AB186.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 639 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Subject to the limitations set forth in subsection 2, a
registered pharmacist may, in accordance with any requirements
prescribed pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Prescribe drugs or devices that are used for the treatment
of health conditions, other than opioid use disorder, that:
(1) Have been previously diagnosed;
(2) Are self-limiting; or
(3) Are acute conditions diagnosed after performing a test
that is classified as a waived test pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Part 493,
Subpart A; and
(b) Dispense a one-time refill of an existing prescription
without authorization from a practitioner, other than a
pharmacist, if, in the professional judgment of the pharmacist, the
health of the patient will be harmed without the patient continuing
to have access to the prescribed drug.
2. A registered pharmacist shall not take any action described
in subsection 1 with regard to a:
(a) Drug or device that is not approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
(b) Controlled substance that is not an opioid, except if the
registered pharmacist is prescribing such a controlled substance
in:
(1) An inpatient medical facility in accordance with the
policies of the facility;
(2) An outpatient medical facility or clinic, only if the
registered pharmacist is acting within a multidisciplinary team;
(3) A program for hospice care or palliative care; or
(4) A program for treatment for substance use disorder.
(c) Controlled substance that is an opioid.
3. The Board may adopt regulations:
(a) Requiring a registered pharmacist who takes the actions
authorized by this section to be covered by adequate liability
insurance, as determined by the Board;
(b) Establishing the scope of the ability for a registered
pharmacist to prescribe drugs and devices and dispense refills as
authorized by subsection 1; and
-
*AB186_R1*

– 4 –
(c) Establishing the standard of care required of a registered
pharmacist who prescribes drugs and devices and dispenses refills
as authorized by subsection 1.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Program of hospice care” means a program of hospice
care described in NRS 449.196.
(c) “Self-limiting” means that a health condition generally
persists for a limited period of time.
Sec. 2. NRS 639.0124 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.0124 1. “Practice of pharmacy” includes, but is not
limited to, the:
(a) Performance or supervision of activities associated with
manufacturing, compounding, labeling, dispensing , [and]
distributing [of] and administering a drug, including the receipt,
handling and storage of prescriptions and other confidential
information relating to patients.
(b) Interpretation and evaluation of prescriptions or orders for
medicine.
(c) Participation in drug evaluation and drug research.
(d) Advising of the therapeutic value, reaction, drug interaction,
hazard and use of a drug.
(e) Selection of the source, storage and distribution of a drug.
(f) Maintenance of proper documentation of the source, storage
and distribution of a drug.
(g) Interpretation of clinical data contained in a person’s record
of medication.
(h) Development of written guidelines and protocols in
collaboration with a practitioner which authorize collaborative drug
therapy management. The written guidelines and protocols must
comply with NRS 639.2629.
(i) Implementation and modification of drug therapy,
administering drugs and ordering and performing tests in
accordance with a collaborative practice agreement.
(j) Prescribing, dispensing and administering of drugs for
preventing the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus and
[ordering and] conducting laboratory tests necessary for therapy that
uses such drugs pursuant to the protocol prescribed pursuant to
NRS 639.28085.
(k) Dispensing a self-administered hormonal contraceptive
pursuant to NRS 639.28078.
(l) Assessing a patient and prescribing and dispensing a drug for
medication-assisted treatment in accordance with NRS 639.28079.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 5 –
(m) Ordering and performing laboratory tests in accordance
with NRS 639.2808.
(n) Prescribing and dispensing drugs and devices and
dispensing refills without the authorization of a practitioner, other
than a pharmacist, in accordance with section 1 of this act.
2. The term does not include the changing of a prescription by
a pharmacist or practitioner without the consent of the prescribing
practitioner, except as otherwise provided in NRS 639.2583,
639.28078 and 639.28085.
Sec. 3. NRS 639.0125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.0125 “Practitioner” means:
1. A physician, dentist, veterinarian or podiatric physician who
holds a license to practice his or her profession in this State;
2. A hospital, pharmacy or other institution licensed, registered
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or administer drugs in the course of professional practice
or research in this State;
3. An advanced practice registered nurse who has been
authorized to prescribe controlled substances, poisons, dangerous
drugs and devices;
4. A physician assistant who:
(a) Holds a license issued by the Board of Medical Examiners;
and
(b) Is authorized by the Board to possess, administer, prescribe
or dispense controlled substances, poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices under the supervision of a physician as required by chapter
630 of NRS;
5. A physician assistant who:
(a) Holds a license issued by the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine; and
(b) Is authorized by the Board to possess, administer, prescribe
or dispense controlled substances, poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices under the supervision of an osteopathic physician as
required by chapter 633 of NRS;
6. An optometrist who is certified by the Nevada State Board
of Optometry to prescribe and administer pharmaceutical agents
pursuant to NRS 636.288, when the optometrist prescribes or
administers pharmaceutical agents within the scope of his or her
certification;
7. A dental hygienist who:
(a) Holds a valid license to practice dental hygiene in this State;
(b) Is authorized to prescribe and dispense the dangerous drugs
and devices listed in NRS 631.3105 in accordance with the
provisions of that section and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto; and
-
*AB186_R1*

– 6 –
(c) Holds a certificate issued pursuant to NRS 639.1374 by the
State Board of Pharmacy authorizing him or her to so prescribe;
8. A pharmacist who [is] :
(a) Is registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 to prescribe and
dispense drugs for medication-assisted treatment; or
(b) Prescribes drugs or devices or dispenses refills without the
authorization of a practitioner, other than a pharmacist, in
accordance with section 1 of this act; or
9. A certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders,
prescribes, possesses or administers controlled substances, poisons,
dangerous drugs or devices in accordance with NRS 632.2397.
Sec. 4. NRS 639.0747 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.0747 [1.] The Board shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 652.210 with regard to
a registered pharmacist, including, without limitation, regulations
that [:
(a) Require a registered pharmacist to use only a fingerstick or
oral or nasal swab to collect the specimens pursuant to NRS
652.210; and
(b) Set] set forth the procedures and requirements with which a
registered pharmacist shall comply when manipulating a person for
the collection of specimens or performing any laboratory test
pursuant to NRS 652.210.
[2. As used in this section, “fingerstick” means a procedure in
which a finger is pricked with a lancet, small blade or other
instrument to obtain a small quantity of blood for any laboratory test
pursuant to NRS 652.210.]
Sec. 5. NRS 639.2808 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.2808 1. A registered pharmacist [or a] may:
(a) Order laboratory tests that are necessary for therapy that
uses a drug approved by the Food and Drug Administration or to
otherwise facilitate the care of a patient within the authorized
scope of practice of the registered pharmacist; and
(b) Perform any laboratory test that is classified as a waived
test under 42 C.F.R. Part 493, Subpart A, including, without
limitation, a blood glucose test using devices for monitoring
approved by the Food and Drug Administration for use in the
home if such a test is performed in compliance with standards of
practice recommended by the Association of Diabetes Care and
Education Specialists.
2. A registered intern pharmacist may perform a blood glucose
test using devices for monitoring approved by the Food and Drug
Administration for use in the home. The performance of such a test
must be in compliance with standards of practice recommended by
the [American] Association of Diabetes [Educators] Care and
-
*AB186_R1*

– 7 –
Education Specialists or its successor organization. The Board may
adopt regulations authorizing a registered intern pharmacist to
perform other activities described in subsection 1.
Sec. 6. NRS 639.28085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.28085 1. To the extent authorized by federal law, a
pharmacist who meets the requirements prescribed by the Board
pursuant to subsection 2 may, in accordance with the requirements
of the protocol prescribed pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) [Order and perform] Perform laboratory tests that are
necessary for therapy that uses a drug approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration for preventing the acquisition of
human immunodeficiency virus; and
(b) Prescribe, dispense and administer any drug described in
paragraph (a) to a patient.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations:
(a) Requiring a pharmacist who takes the actions authorized by
this section to be covered by adequate liability insurance, as
determined by the Board; and
(b) Establishing a protocol for the actions authorized by this
section.
Sec. 7. NRS 652.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
652.125 1. The Board shall adopt regulations for the
certification and licensure of laboratory directors and laboratory
personnel who perform technical duties other than the collection of
blood. The regulations must authorize a registered pharmacist to
serve as the laboratory director of an exempt laboratory,
regardless of whether the registered pharmacist has entered into a
collaborative practice agreement.
2. The Division shall, as a prerequisite for the renewal of a
certificate or license, require the laboratory director and any
laboratory personnel certified by the Division pursuant to this
chapter to comply with the requirements for continuing education
adopted by the Board.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Collaborative practice agreement” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 639.0052.
(b) “Exempt laboratory” means a laboratory:
(1) That is licensed pursuant to this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(2) That does not only perform testing for human
immunodeficiency virus; and
(3) In which each test performed is:
(I) Classified as a waived test pursuant to 42 C.F.R. Part
493, Subpart A; or
-
*AB186_R1*

– 8 –
(II) Categorized as a provider-performed microscopy
procedure pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 493.19.
Sec. 8. NRS 287.0271 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.0271 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada that provides health insurance through a plan of self-
insurance shall provide coverage for:
(a) Drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses
such a drug; and
(c) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the governing
body.
2. The governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that
provides health insurance through a plan of self-insurance shall
reimburse a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
governing body for the services described in [NRS 639.28085]
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
3. The governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that
provides health insurance through a plan of self-insurance may
subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to reasonable medical
management techniques.
4. The governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that
provides health insurance through a plan of self-insurance shall
ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available
to an insured through a provider of health care who participates in
the network plan of the governing body.
5. A plan of self-insurance described in subsection 1 that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts with the
provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 9 –
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a plan of self-insurance provided by
the governing body of a local governmental agency under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the governing body.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 9. NRS 422.27235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.27235 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Any laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses
a drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
for preventing the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus.
(b) The ordering of a laboratory test described in paragraph
(a) by a pharmacist and the services of a pharmacist described in
NRS 639.28085. The State must provide reimbursement for such
services at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided to a
physician, physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse
for similar services.
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation.
2. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that the State reimburse an advanced practice registered
nurse or a physician assistant for any service to test for, prevent or
treat human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar
services.
3. As used in this section, “primary care” means the practice of
family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and
gynecology and midwifery.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 10 –
Sec. 10. NRS 453.126 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.126 “Practitioner” means:
1. A physician, dentist, veterinarian or podiatric physician who
holds a license to practice his or her profession in this State and is
registered pursuant to this chapter.
2. An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a
certificate from the State Board of Pharmacy authorizing him or her
to dispense or to prescribe and dispense controlled substances.
3. A scientific investigator or a pharmacy, hospital or other
institution licensed, registered or otherwise authorized in this State
to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, to
administer, or use in teaching or chemical analysis, a controlled
substance in the course of professional practice or research.
4. A euthanasia technician who is licensed by the Nevada State
Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners and registered pursuant to
this chapter, while he or she possesses or administers sodium
pentobarbital pursuant to his or her license and registration.
5. A physician assistant who:
(a) Holds a license from the Board of Medical Examiners; and
(b) Is authorized by the Board to possess, administer, prescribe
or dispense controlled substances under the supervision of a
physician as required by chapter 630 of NRS.
6. A physician assistant who:
(a) Holds a license from the State Board of Osteopathic
Medicine; and
(b) Is authorized by the Board to possess, administer, prescribe
or dispense controlled substances under the supervision of an
osteopathic physician as required by chapter 633 of NRS.
7. An optometrist who is certified by the Nevada State Board
of Optometry to prescribe and administer pharmaceutical agents
pursuant to NRS 636.288, when the optometrist prescribes or
administers pharmaceutical agents within the scope of his or her
certification.
8. A certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders,
prescribes, possesses or administers controlled substances in
accordance with NRS 632.2397.
9. A pharmacist who [is] :
(a) Is registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 to prescribe and
dispense drugs for medication-assisted treatment [.] ; or
(b) Prescribes and dispenses drugs or devices or dispenses
refills without the authorization of a practitioner, other than a
pharmacist, in accordance with section 1 of this act.
Sec. 11. NRS 453.128 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.128 1. “Prescription” means:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 11 –
(a) An order given individually for the person for whom
prescribed, directly from a physician, physician assistant licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, podiatric physician,
optometrist, advanced practice registered nurse, certified registered
nurse anesthetist, pharmacist registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079
or acting in accordance with section 1 of this act or veterinarian, or
his or her agent, to a pharmacist or indirectly by means of an order
signed by the practitioner or an electronic transmission from the
practitioner to a pharmacist; or
(b) A chart order written for an inpatient specifying drugs which
he or she is to take home upon his or her discharge.
2. The term does not include a chart order written for an
inpatient for use while he or she is an inpatient.
Sec. 12. NRS 453.226 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.226 1. Every practitioner or other person who dispenses
any controlled substance within this State or who proposes to
engage in the dispensing of any controlled substance within this
State shall obtain biennially a registration issued by the Board in
accordance with its regulations. A person must present proof that he
or she is authorized to access the database of the program
established pursuant to NRS 453.162 before the Board may issue or
renew a registration.
2. A person registered by the Board in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 453.011 to 453.552, inclusive, to dispense or
conduct research with controlled substances may possess, dispense
or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized
by the registration and in conformity with the other provisions of
those sections.
3. The following persons are not required to register and may
lawfully possess and distribute controlled substances pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 453.011 to 453.552, inclusive:
(a) An agent or employee of a registered dispenser of a
controlled substance if he or she is acting in the usual course of his
or her business or employment;
(b) A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an
employee thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is
in the usual course of business or employment;
(c) An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled
substance pursuant to a lawful order of a physician, physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist,
advanced practice registered nurse, certified registered nurse
anesthetist, podiatric physician, pharmacist registered pursuant to
NRS 639.28079 or acting in accordance with section 1 of this act
or veterinarian or in lawful possession of a schedule V substance; or
(d) A physician who:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 12 –
(1) Holds a locum tenens license issued by the Board of
Medical Examiners or a temporary license issued by the State Board
of Osteopathic Medicine; and
(2) Is registered with the Drug Enforcement Administration
at a location outside this State.
4. The Board may waive the requirement for registration of
certain dispensers if it finds it consistent with the public health and
safety.
5. A separate registration is required at each principal place of
business or professional practice where the applicant dispenses
controlled substances.
6. The Board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or
applicant for registration in accordance with the Board’s regulations.
Sec. 13. NRS 453.336 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.336 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a
person shall not knowingly or intentionally possess a controlled
substance, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or
pursuant to, a prescription or order of a physician, physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist,
podiatric physician, optometrist, advanced practice registered nurse,
certified registered nurse anesthetist, pharmacist registered pursuant
to NRS 639.28079 or acting in accordance with section 1 of this
act or veterinarian while acting in the course of his or her
professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by the
provisions of NRS 453.005 to 453.552, inclusive.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4 and 5 and
in NRS 453.3363, and unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
212.160, 453.3385, 453.3387 or 453.339, a person who violates this
section:
(a) For a first or second offense, if the controlled substance is
listed in schedule I or II and the quantity possessed is less than 14
grams, or if the controlled substance is listed in schedule III, IV or V
and the quantity possessed is less than 28 grams, is guilty of
possession of a controlled substance and shall be punished for a
category E felony as provided in NRS 193.130. In accordance with
NRS 176.211, the court shall defer judgment upon the consent of the
person.
(b) For a third or subsequent offense, if the controlled substance
is listed in schedule I or II and the quantity possessed is less than 14
grams, or if the controlled substance is listed in schedule III, IV or V
and the quantity possessed is less than 28 grams, or if the offender
has previously been convicted two or more times in the aggregate of
any violation of the law of the United States or of any state, territory
or district relating to a controlled substance, is guilty of possession
of a controlled substance and shall be punished for a category D
-
*AB186_R1*

– 13 –
felony as provided in NRS 193.130, and may be further punished by
a fine of not more than $20,000.
(c) If the controlled substance is listed in schedule I or II and the
quantity possessed is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, or if
the controlled substance is listed in schedule III, IV or V and the
quantity possessed is 28 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, is
guilty of low-level possession of a controlled substance and shall be
punished for a category C felony as provided in NRS 193.130.
(d) If the controlled substance is listed in schedule I or II and the
quantity possessed is 28 grams or more, but less than 42 grams, or if
the controlled substance is listed in schedule III, IV or V and the
quantity possessed is 200 grams or more, is guilty of mid-level
possession of a controlled substance and shall be punished for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years and by a fine of not more than $50,000.
(e) If the controlled substance is listed in schedule I or II and the
quantity possessed is 42 grams or more, but less than 100 grams, is
guilty of high-level possession of a controlled substance and shall be
punished for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison
for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of
not more than 15 years and by a fine of not more than $50,000.
3. Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS 212.160,
453.337 or 453.3385, a person who is convicted of the possession of
flunitrazepam or gamma-hydroxybutyrate, or any substance for
which flunitrazepam or gamma-hydroxybutyrate is an immediate
precursor, is guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years.
4. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
212.160, a person who is convicted of the possession of 1 ounce or
less of marijuana is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished
by:
(a) Performing not more than 24 hours of community service;
(b) Attending the live meeting described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 2 of NRS 484C.530 and complying with any other
requirements set forth in that section; or
(c) Being required to undergo an evaluation in accordance with
subsection 1 of NRS 484C.350,
 or any combination thereof.
5. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
212.160, a person who is convicted of the possession of more than 1
ounce, but less than 50 pounds, of marijuana or more than one-
eighth of an ounce, but less than one pound, of concentrated
-
*AB186_R1*

– 14 –
cannabis is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as
provided in NRS 193.130.
6. It is not a violation of this section if a person possesses a
trace amount of a controlled substance and that trace amount is in or
on a hypodermic device obtained from a sterile hypodermic device
program pursuant to NRS 439.985 to 439.994, inclusive.
7. The court may grant probation to or suspend the sentence of
a person convicted of violating this section.
8. If a person fulfills the terms and conditions imposed for a
violation of subsection 4, the court shall, without a hearing, order
sealed all documents, papers and exhibits in that person’s record,
minute book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents
relating to the case in the custody of such other agencies and
officers as are named in the court’s order. The court shall cause a
copy of the order to be sent to each agency or officer named in the
order. Each such agency or officer shall notify the court in writing
of its compliance with the order.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Controlled substance” includes flunitrazepam, gamma-
hydroxybutyrate and each substance for which flunitrazepam or
gamma-hydroxybutyrate is an immediate precursor.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include concentrated cannabis.
(c) “Sterile hypodermic device program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 439.986.
Sec. 14. NRS 453.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.375 1. A controlled substance may be possessed and
administered by the following persons:
(a) A practitioner.
(b) A registered nurse licensed to practice professional nursing
or licensed practical nurse, at the direction of a physician, physician
assistant, dentist, podiatric physician or advanced practice registered
nurse, or pursuant to a chart order, for administration to a patient at
another location.
(c) A paramedic:
(1) As authorized by regulation of:
(I) The State Board of Health in a county whose
population is less than 100,000; or
(II) A county or district board of health in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more; and
(2) In accordance with any applicable regulations of:
(I) The State Board of Health in a county whose
population is less than 100,000;
(II) A county board of health in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more; or
-
*AB186_R1*

– 15 –
(III) A district board of health created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or 439.370 in any county.
(d) A respiratory therapist, at the direction of a physician or
physician assistant.
(e) An anesthesiologist assistant, at the direction of a
supervising anesthesiologist or supervising osteopathic
anesthesiologist.
(f) A medical student, student in training to become a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant, student nurse in the course of
his or her studies at an accredited college of medicine or approved
school of professional or practical nursing, at the direction of a
physician or physician assistant and:
(1) In the presence of a physician, physician assistant or a
registered nurse; or
(2) Under the supervision of a physician, physician assistant
or a registered nurse if the student is authorized by the college or
school to administer the substance outside the presence of a
physician, physician assistant or nurse.
 A medical student or student nurse may administer a controlled
substance in the presence or under the supervision of a registered
nurse alone only if the circumstances are such that the registered
nurse would be authorized to administer it personally.
(g) An ultimate user or any person whom the ultimate user
designates pursuant to a written agreement.
(h) Any person designated by the head of a correctional
institution.
(i) A veterinary technician at the direction of his or her
supervising veterinarian.
(j) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Health, an employee of a residential facility for groups, as
defined in NRS 449.017, pursuant to a written agreement entered
into by the ultimate user.
(k) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Pharmacy, an animal control officer, a wildlife biologist or an
employee designated by a federal, state or local governmental
agency whose duties include the control of domestic, wild and
predatory animals.
(l) A person who is enrolled in a training program to become a
paramedic, respiratory therapist or veterinary technician if the
person possesses and administers the controlled substance in the
same manner and under the same conditions that apply, respectively,
to a paramedic, respiratory therapist or veterinary technician who
may possess and administer the controlled substance, and under the
direct supervision of a person licensed or registered to perform the
respective medical art or a supervisor of such a person.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 16 –
(m) A registered pharmacist . [pursuant to written guidelines and
protocols developed pursuant to NRS 639.2629 or a collaborative
practice agreement, as defined in NRS 639.0052.]
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Accredited college of medicine” means:
(1) A medical school that is accredited by the Liaison
Committee on Medical Education of the American Medical
Association and the Association of American Medical Colleges or
their successor organizations; or
(2) A school of osteopathic medicine, as defined in
NRS 633.121.
(b) “Anesthesiologist assistant” means a person who holds a
license issued pursuant to NRS 630.2683 or 633.4254 or a
temporary license issued pursuant to NRS 630.2685 or 633.4262.
Sec. 15. NRS 453.381 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.381 1. In addition to the limitations imposed by NRS
453.256 and 453.3611 to 453.3648, inclusive, a physician, physician
assistant, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse, certified
registered nurse anesthetist, podiatric physician or pharmacist
registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 or acting in accordance with
section 1 of this act may prescribe or administer controlled
substances only for a legitimate medical purpose and in the usual
course of his or her professional practice, and he or she shall not
prescribe, administer or dispense a controlled substance listed in
schedule II for himself or herself, his or her spouse or his or her
children except in cases of emergency.
2. A veterinarian, in the course of his or her professional
practice only, and not for use by a human being, may prescribe,
possess and administer controlled substances, and the veterinarian
may cause them to be administered by a veterinary technician under
the direction and supervision of the veterinarian.
3. A euthanasia technician, within the scope of his or her
license, and not for use by a human being, may possess and
administer sodium pentobarbital.
4. A pharmacist shall not fill an order which purports to be a
prescription if the pharmacist has reason to believe that it was not
issued in the usual course of the professional practice of a physician,
physician assistant, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse,
certified registered nurse anesthetist, podiatric physician, pharmacist
registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 or acting in accordance with
section 1 of this act or veterinarian.
5. Any person who has obtained from a physician, physician
assistant, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse, certified
registered nurse anesthetist, podiatric physician, pharmacist
registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 or acting in accordance with
-
*AB186_R1*

– 17 –
section 1 of this act or veterinarian any controlled substance for
administration to a patient during the absence of the physician,
physician assistant, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse,
certified registered nurse anesthetist, podiatric physician, pharmacist
or veterinarian shall return to him or her any unused portion of the
substance when it is no longer required by the patient.
6. A manufacturer, wholesale supplier or other person legally
able to furnish or sell any controlled substance listed in schedule II
shall not provide samples of such a controlled substance to
registrants.
7. A salesperson of any manufacturer or wholesaler of
pharmaceuticals shall not possess, transport or furnish any
controlled substance listed in schedule II.
8. A person shall not dispense a controlled substance in
violation of a regulation adopted by the Board.
Sec. 16. NRS 454.00958 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
454.00958 “Practitioner” means:
1. A physician, dentist, veterinarian or podiatric physician who
holds a valid license to practice his or her profession in this State.
2. A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed or
registered to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or
to administer a dangerous drug in the course of professional practice
in this State.
3. When relating to the prescription of poisons, dangerous
drugs and devices:
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a certificate
from the State Board of Pharmacy permitting him or her so to
prescribe; or
(b) A physician assistant who holds a license from the Board of
Medical Examiners and a certificate from the State Board of
Pharmacy permitting him or her so to prescribe.
4. An optometrist who is certified to prescribe and administer
pharmaceutical agents pursuant to NRS 636.288 when the
optometrist prescribes or administers dangerous drugs which are
within the scope of his or her certification.
5. A dental hygienist who holds a valid license to practice
dental hygiene in this State and:
(a) Is authorized to prescribe and dispense the dangerous drugs
listed in NRS 631.3105 in accordance with the provisions of that
section and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Holds a certificate issued by the State Board of Pharmacy
pursuant to NRS 639.1374 authorizing him or her to so prescribe.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 18 –
6. A certified registered nurse anesthetist who orders,
prescribes, possesses or administers poisons, dangerous drugs or
devices in accordance with NRS 632.2397.
7. A pharmacist who [is] :
(a) Is registered pursuant to NRS 639.28079 to prescribe and
dispense drugs for medication-assisted treatment [.] ; or
(b) Prescribes and dispenses drugs or devices or dispenses
refills without the authorization of a practitioner, other than a
pharmacist, in accordance with section 1 of this act.
Sec. 17. NRS 454.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
454.213 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 454.217, a
drug or medicine referred to in NRS 454.181 to 454.371, inclusive,
may be possessed and administered by:
(a) A practitioner.
(b) A physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633
of NRS or an anesthesiologist assistant, at the direction of his or her
supervising physician or supervising anesthesiologist or supervising
osteopathic anesthesiologist, as applicable, or a licensed dental
hygienist or expanded function dental assistant acting in the office
of and under the supervision of a dentist.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), a registered
nurse licensed to practice professional nursing or licensed practical
nurse, at the direction of a prescribing physician, physician assistant
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, podiatric
physician or advanced practice registered nurse, or pursuant to a
chart order, for administration to a patient at another location.
(d) In accordance with applicable regulations of the Board, a
registered nurse licensed to practice professional nursing or licensed
practical nurse who is:
(1) Employed by a health care agency or health care facility
that is authorized to provide emergency care, or to respond to the
immediate needs of a patient, in the residence of the patient; and
(2) Acting under the direction of the medical director of that
agency or facility who works in this State.
(e) A medication aide - certified at a designated facility under
the supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or
registered nurse and in accordance with standard protocols
developed by the State Board of Nursing. As used in this paragraph,
“designated facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 632.0145.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (g), an advanced
emergency medical technician or a paramedic, as authorized by
regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy and in accordance with
any applicable regulations of:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 19 –
(1) The State Board of Health in a county whose population
is less than 100,000;
(2) A county board of health in a county whose population is
100,000 or more; or
(3) A district board of health created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or 439.370 in any county.
(g) An advanced emergency medical technician or a paramedic
who holds an endorsement issued pursuant to NRS 450B.1975,
under the direct supervision of a local health officer or a designee of
the local health officer pursuant to that section.
(h) A respiratory therapist employed in a health care facility.
The therapist may possess and administer respiratory products only
at the direction of a physician.
(i) A dialysis technician, under the direction or supervision of a
physician or registered nurse only if the drug or medicine is used for
the process of renal dialysis.
(j) A medical student or student nurse in the course of his or her
studies at an accredited college of medicine or approved school of
professional or practical nursing, at the direction of a physician and:
(1) In the presence of a physician or a registered nurse; or
(2) Under the supervision of a physician or a registered nurse
if the student is authorized by the college or school to administer the
drug or medicine outside the presence of a physician or nurse.
 A medical student or student nurse may administer a dangerous
drug in the presence or under the supervision of a registered nurse
alone only if the circumstances are such that the registered nurse
would be authorized to administer it personally.
(k) Any person designated by the head of a correctional
institution.
(l) An ultimate user or any person designated by the ultimate
user pursuant to a written agreement.
(m) A holder of a license to engage in radiation therapy and
radiologic imaging issued pursuant to chapter 653 of NRS, at the
direction of a physician and in accordance with any conditions
established by regulation of the Board.
(n) A chiropractic physician, but only if the drug or medicine is
a topical drug used for cooling and stretching external tissue during
therapeutic treatments.
(o) A physical therapist, but only if the drug or medicine is a
topical drug which is:
(1) Used for cooling and stretching external tissue during
therapeutic treatments; and
(2) Prescribed by a licensed physician for:
(I) Iontophoresis; or
-
*AB186_R1*

– 20 –
(II) The transmission of drugs through the skin using
ultrasound.
(p) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Health, an employee of a residential facility for groups, as
defined in NRS 449.017, pursuant to a written agreement entered
into by the ultimate user.
(q) A veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant at the
direction of his or her supervising veterinarian.
(r) [In accordance with applicable regulations of the Board, a
registered pharmacist who:
(1) Is trained in and certified to carry out standards and
practices for immunization programs;
(2) Is authorized to administer immunizations pursuant to
written protocols from a physician; and
(3) Administers immunizations in compliance with the
“Standards for Immunization Practices” recommended and
approved by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(s)] A registered pharmacist . [pursuant to written guidelines and
protocols developed pursuant to NRS 639.2629 or a collaborative
practice agreement, as defined in NRS 639.0052.
(t)] (s) A person who is enrolled in a training program to
become a physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed
pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dental hygienist, advanced
emergency medical technician, paramedic, respiratory therapist,
dialysis technician, physical therapist or veterinary technician or to
obtain a license to engage in radiation therapy and radiologic
imaging pursuant to chapter 653 of NRS if the person possesses and
administers the drug or medicine in the same manner and under the
same conditions that apply, respectively, to a physician assistant or
anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS, dental hygienist, advanced emergency medical technician,
paramedic, respiratory therapist, dialysis technician, physical
therapist, veterinary technician or person licensed to engage in
radiation therapy and radiologic imaging who may possess and
administer the drug or medicine, and under the direct supervision of
a person licensed or registered to perform the respective medical art
or a supervisor of such a person.
[(u)] (t) A medical assistant, in accordance with applicable
regulations of the:
(1) Board of Medical Examiners, at the direction of the
prescribing physician and under the supervision of a physician or
physician assistant.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 21 –
(2) State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, at the direction of
the prescribing physician and under the supervision of a physician
or physician assistant.
2. As used in this section, “accredited college of medicine” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.375.
Sec. 18. NRS 689A.0437 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0437 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in [NRS 639.28085] paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
-
*AB186_R1*

– 22 –
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 19. NRS 689B.0312 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0312 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the insurer;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
-
*AB186_R1*

– 23 –
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
insurer for the services described in [NRS 639.28085] paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the insurer for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. An insurer shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
5. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 24 –
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 20. NRS 689C.1671 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1671 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the carrier;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of the
carrier.
2. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the health benefit plan of
the carrier for the services described in [NRS 639.28085] paragraph
-
*AB186_R1*

– 25 –
(d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the carrier for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A carrier shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 26 –
Sec. 21. NRS 695A.1843 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1843 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the benefit coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the society;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the society.
2. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
society for the services described in [NRS 639.28085] paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement
provided to a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the society for any
service to test for, prevent or treat human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of reimbursement provided
to a physician for similar services.
3. A society shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
-
*AB186_R1*

– 27 –
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
5. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 22. NRS 695B.1924 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1924 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the hospital or medical services organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy using a drug
to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
-
*AB186_R1*

– 28 –
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the hospital or
medical services corporation.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
hospital or medical services corporation for the services described in
[NRS 639.28085] paragraph (d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the hospital or
medical services corporation for any service to test for, prevent or
treat human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to
the rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar
services.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
-
*AB186_R1*

– 29 –
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 23. NRS 695C.1743 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1743 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the health maintenance organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
health maintenance organization for the services described in [NRS
639.28085] paragraph (d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate
-
*AB186_R1*

– 30 –
of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the
rate of reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the enrollee is diagnosed.
4. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB186_R1*

– 31 –
Sec. 24. NRS 695G.1705 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1705 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) All drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for preventing the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus or treating human immunodeficiency virus
or hepatitis C in the form recommended by the prescribing
practitioner, regardless of whether the drug is included in the
formulary of the managed care organization;
(b) Laboratory testing that is necessary for therapy that uses a
drug to prevent the acquisition of human immunodeficiency virus;
(c) Any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C provided by a provider of
primary care if the service is covered when provided by a specialist
and:
(1) The service is within the scope of practice of the provider
of primary care; or
(2) The provider of primary care is capable of providing the
service safely and effectively in consultation with a specialist and
the provider engages in such consultation; and
(d) [The] Ordering laboratory testing described in paragraph
(b) and the services described in NRS 639.28085, when provided by
a pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the managed
care organization.
2. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall reimburse:
(a) A pharmacist who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization for the services described in [NRS
639.28085] paragraph (d) of subsection 1 at a rate equal to the rate
of reimbursement provided to a physician, physician assistant or
advanced practice registered nurse for similar services.
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse or a physician
assistant who participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization for any service to test for, prevent or treat human
immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C at a rate equal to the rate of
reimbursement provided to a physician for similar services.
3. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Subject the benefits required by subsection 1 to medical
management techniques, other than step therapy;
(b) Limit the covered amount of a drug described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1;
(c) Refuse to cover a drug described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 because the drug is dispensed by a pharmacy through
mail order service; or
-
*AB186_R1*

– 32 –
(d) Prohibit or restrict access to any service or drug to treat
human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C on the same day on
which the insured is diagnosed.
4. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that conflicts
with the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or use of health care services or prescription
drugs. The term includes, without limitation, the use of step therapy,
prior authorization and categorizing drugs and devices based on
cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Primary care” means the practice of family medicine,
pediatrics, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology and
midwifery.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 25. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 24, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB186_R1*